Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2298
Destination; diversion of livestock; prohibited; when.

Whenever livestock are required or designated pursuant to the Pseudorabies Control and Eradication Act to move to a particular destination, it shall be unlawful to divert the livestock from such destination without having first obtained permission from the department.

Laws 1986, LB 775, § 33;

Laws 1990, LB 1004, § 45;

R.S.Supp.,1990, § 54-2233;

Laws 1991, LB 359, § 64.